src/orthography/eighties-to-standard.xfscript
! =====================================!
! Orthographic converter for Inari Saami 
! =====================================!

! This program translates text written in the orthography
! of the 80s into modern orthography.

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


define Vow [ a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | á | â |  A | E | I | O | U | Y | Ä | Á | Â ] ; 


define Cns [ b | c | č | d | đ | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | p 
           | r | s | š | t | v | w | x | z | ž 
           | B | C | Č | D | Đ | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | P 
           | R | S | Š | T | V | W | X | Z | Ž ] ;
  

echo << Rules>>

define OA o a (->) u á ;

define EA e ä (->) i ä ;

define A a (->) â || (Cns) Vow+ Cns+ _ ;



echo << Combining >>

read regex [ OA
.o. EA 
.o. A ] ;

# cd src/orthography/
# xfst -e " source < oldorthography2norm.xfscript "
# invert net
# save o2n.fst
# quit

# poasui - puásui
# kiela - kielâ
